New York, session 2025-2026, A7111.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 315 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. The empire state development corporation shall retain one or more 4 independent MWBE consultant firms for the purpose of helping reduce 5 contractor violations of the provisions of this article. Any contractor 6 found by the director to be in violation of the provisions of this arti- 7 cle shall be required by the director to retain an independent monitor 8 who shall examine the circumstances under which a contractor's violation 9 or violations occurred, assist the contractor in rectifying its 10 violations, implement any remedial action plan as described in subdivi- 11 sions six and seven of this section, and, until such time as the 12 contractor is no longer in violation of the provisions of this article, 13 operate as an independent monitor to oversee the contractor's compliance 14 with its obligations under this article. The contractor's monitor shall 15 provide regular reports concerning the contractor's compliance and 16 progress to the MWBE contractor assigned to review the contractor. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 315 19 of the executive law made by section one of this act shall not affect 20 the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03834-01-5